Arkansas, session 2025, HB1656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-72-305, concerning the allocation of
production and cost following integration order, is amended to add additional
subsections to read as follows:
(c) As used in this section, "net proceeds" means the same as defined
in § 15-72-325.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 72, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-72-325. Obligation of operators and working interest owners to
mineral owners — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "net proceeds" means:
(1) If a mineral interest within a drilling unit is an
integrated interest not covered by an executed lease, the gross proceeds from
the sale of gas, including royalty gas, minus applicable taxes, assessments,
*CRH145*
04-01-2025 11:41:49 CRH145

As Engrossed: S3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1656
and true third-party costs or costs specifically allowed by the form lease
adopted by the Oil and Gas Commission; and
(2) If a mineral interest within a drilling unit is covered by
an executed lease, the gross proceeds from the sale of gas, including royalty
gas, minus applicable tax, assessments, and charges or deductions
specifically allowed by the terms of the lease.
(b)(1) Ownership of minerals, including the proceeds paid as royalty
from the sale of the production of the mineral estate, is a property right.
(2) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a mineral owner
shall have the right to contract pertaining to their owned mineral interest.
(c)(1) The minimum royalty payable to royalty owners from the
production of gas shall be one-eighth (1/8) of the net proceeds from the sale
of the gas.
(2) A mineral owner may negotiate a higher royalty with a lessee
by contract.
(d)(1) If a mineral interest within a drilling unit is covered
by an executed lease, then the working interest owner or owners of the
respective lease is or are responsible for ensuring the full amount of
royalties are paid to a royalty owner in compliance with the terms of the
lease regardless of whether the payments are made by the operator or, if
applicable the nonoperating working interest owner or owners that is or are a
party to the lease.
(2) If deductions or expenses are taken by the operator or the
nonoperating working interest owner or owners that is or are a party to the
lease that are not in accordance with the lease terms, including deductions
and expenses pertaining to royalty gas, then the deductions or expenses not
specifically allowed by the applicable lease shall be reimbursed to the
royalty owner within thirty (30) days of the deduction being taken from the
royalty payment of the royalty owner.
(3) This section and § 15-72-305 shall not excuse or relieve the
obligation of a working interest owner as it pertains to the contractual
lease obligations with the royalty owner.
(e) This section is not applicable to any producing unit or well that
produces liquid hydrocarbons only, liquid hydrocarbons associated with the
production of gas, or gas produced associated with the production of liquid
hydrocarbons.
04-01-2025 11:41:49 CRH145

As Engrossed: S3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1656

/s/Beck


































04-01-2025 11:41:49 CRH145